Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-931
Person challenged as to right to vote; oath; clerks of election; duties.

If a person's right to vote is challenged, the person shall, in the presence of an inspector or a judge of election, affix his or her signature to the following oath: I do solemnly swear that I am a citizen of the United States, that I have residence in the State of Nebraska, the county of ........., and this precinct, that I reside at ............... (Address), and that I have attained the constitutionally prescribed age to be a voter. The clerks of election shall write Sworn on the precinct list of registered voters and the precinct sign-in register at the end of such person's name.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 274.

Legislature has provided residence requirements for voting purposes. League of Nebraska Municipalities v. Marsh, 253 F.Supp. 27 (D. Neb. 1966).